Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

General Provisions

7-82-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Utility District Law of 1937.”

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.26; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2601.

Cross-References. Exemption of certain utility districts from rural electric and community services cooperative provisions, §65-25-129.

Municipal utilities, title 7, ch. 34.

Utility location, title 13, ch. 24, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 214; 10 Tenn. Juris., Drains and Sewers, § 16; 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 13; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3; 25 Tenn. Juris., Water Companies and Waterworks, §§ 3, 5.

Law Reviews.

Political Subdivisions Versus Employers: Does Jurisdiction of NLRB Extend to Public Utility Districts? (Robert Schneider), 1 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 347 (1971).

Attorney General Opinions. Payments to utility district commissioner in lieu of insurance premium payments, OAG 99-133, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (7/7/99).

Sale of existing infrastructure by utility district, OAG 06-160 (10/9/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 180.

7-82-102. Review of rates and services.

In all counties and districts, the following apply:

In addition to any other procedure provided by law for the review of the actions of the board of commissioners, there is granted to the utility management review board the authority to review rates charged and services provided by public utility districts. The review provided for in this subdivision (1) may only be initiated by a petition containing the genuine signatures of at least ten percent (10%) of the customers within the authorized area of the public utility district;

To be considered by the board, the customer or customers initiating the petition must file a letter of intent to compile and file the petition with the board before the petition is signed. All signatures of customers on the petition must have been obtained within ninety (90) days of the date the notice of intent to compile and file petition is filed with the board. Each customer signing the petition shall include the address at which the customer receives utility service and the date the customer signed the petition. The petition must be addressed to the utility management review board and a copy of the petition must be served upon the board of commissioners of the affected utility district. The petition must contain the genuine signatures of the customers of the utility district. All information submitted in the petition must be legible;

Upon receipt of the petition, the board shall verify the names and addresses of the signers of the petition to ensure that they are bona fide customers of the utility district and to ensure that all signatures have been obtained within ninety (90) days of the date the notice of intent to compile and file petition is filed with the board. As used in this part, “customer” means a person who receives a bill for utility services and pays money for such services. Each utility account shall be entitled to one (1) signature, but no person shall sign the petition more than once. Only one (1) petition to review the rates and services provided under this section can be filed in any twelve-month period. The review by the utility management review board shall be held only upon public hearings, after notice;

For purposes of this section, “genuine signatures” means written, original signatures and excludes facsimile and electronic signatures of any kind;

The utility management review board shall review those petitions pertaining to rates on the basis of all provisions of this chapter governing the establishment of rates, the provisions of any bond resolutions or other debt contract instruments binding upon such utility districts, and the uniform audit manual prepared by the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to § 7-82-401;

It is the express intent of the general assembly that the review granted in this section shall be a substantive and meaningful review. In order to accomplish this intention, the utility district shall take no action that will result in contractually binding the district or obligating the district to issue bonds that would require a rate increase, until the district has first given notice to the customers of the district of the anticipated action. For purposes of this subdivision (6), the notice shall be deemed to have been given by the district with respect to an issuance of bonds or notes upon the publication of the report of the comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designee, as contemplated by § 7-82-501(c), and “bonds” does not include any bond or bonds or other evidence of indebtedness of the utility district to be purchased by the United States department of agriculture or any other direct lending department of the government of the United States; and

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, applies to all procedures and proceedings coming before the utility management review board pursuant to this section, to the extent not inconsistent with this chapter.

Acts 1973, ch. 249, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-2637; Acts 1984, ch. 796, § 1; 1987, ch. 422, § 1; 1989, ch. 221, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 81; 2013, ch. 141, §§ 9, 10; 2015, ch. 140, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 18; 2017, ch. 129, § 6; 2018, ch. 495, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 18 amended this section, effective April 4, 2017; however, Acts 2017, ch. 129, § 6 rewrote the section, effective April 17, 2017.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (a)(1)(D).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 94, in (b), substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in the first sentence of (1); substituted “the commission” for “the authority” in the last two sentences of (1) and in (4), and substituted “The commission” for “The authority” at the beginning of (2).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 129 rewrote the section which read: “(a) In all counties and districts, except those excluded in subsection (b), the following shall apply:“(1)(A) Except as to those districts coming within §7-82-103(b)(2), in addition to any other procedure provided by law for the review of the actions of the board of commissioners, there is hereby granted to the utility management review board the authority to review rates charged and services provided by public utility districts. The review provided for in this subsection (a) can only be initiated by a petition containing the genuine signatures of at least ten percent (10%) of the customers within the authorized area of the public utility district; “(B) To be considered by the board, the customer or customers initiating the petition must file a letter of intent to compile and file the petition with the board before the petition is signed. All signatures of customers on the petition must have been obtained within ninety (90) days of the date the notice of intent to compile and file petition is filed with the board. Each customer signing the petition shall include the address at which the customer receives utility service and the date the customer signed the petition. The petition shall be addressed to the utility management review board and a copy of the petition shall be served upon the board of commissioners of the affected utility district. The petition must contain the genuine signatures of the customers of the utility district. All information submitted in the petition must be legible; “(C) Upon receipt of the petition, the board shall verify the names and addresses of the signers of the petition to ensure that they are bona fide customers of the utility district and to ensure that all signatures have been obtained within ninety (90) days of the date the notice of intent to compile and file petition is filed with the board. As used in this part, “customer” means a person who receives a bill for utility services and pays money for such services. Each utility account shall be entitled to one (1) signature, but no person shall sign the petition more than once. Only one (1) petition to review the rates and services provided under this section can be filed in any twelve-month period. The review by the utility management review board shall be held only upon public hearings, after notice;“(D) For purposes of this subdivision (a)(1), “genuine signatures” means written, original signatures and excludes facsimile and electronic signatures of any kind;“(2) The utility management review board shall review those petitions pertaining to rates on the basis of all provisions of this chapter governing the establishment of rates, the provisions of any bond resolutions or other debt contract instruments binding upon such utility districts, and the rules and regulations promulgated by the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to §7-82-401; “(3) It is the express intent of the general assembly that the review granted in this subsection (a) shall be a substantive and meaningful review. In order to accomplish this intention, the utility district shall take no action that will result in contractually binding the district or obligating the district to issue bonds that would require a rate increase, until the district shall have first given notice to the customers of the district of such anticipated action; and “(4) The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act shall apply to all procedures and proceedings coming before the utility management review board pursuant to this subsection (a), to the extent not inconsistent with this chapter. “(b) In those counties and districts specified in subdivision (b)(5), the following shall apply:“(1) Except as to those districts coming within §7-82-103, in addition to any other procedure provided by law for the review of the actions of the board of commissioners, there is hereby granted to the Tennessee public utility commission the authority to review rates charged and services provided by public utility districts. The review provided for in this subsection (b) can only be initiated by a petition signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the users within the authorized area of the public utility district. The petition shall be addressed to the commission and a copy of the petition shall be served upon the board of commissioners of the affected utility district. The review by the commission shall be held only upon public hearings, after notice, in the county in which the utility district maintains its principal office; “(2) The commission shall review those petitions pertaining to rates as fully as in the case of private utility companies; provided, that the burden shall be upon the petitioners to show that the rates are discriminatory or unjust and unreasonable. In considering rate petitions, the authority shall take no action that adversely impairs the obligation of contracts or payment of existing bonds by such district, and may, within its sound legal discretion, assess costs of such hearings as equity and justice may demand; “(3) It is the express intent of the general assembly that the review granted in this subsection (b) shall be a substantive and meaningful review. In order to accomplish this intention, the utility district shall take no action that will result in contractually binding the district or obligating the district to issue bonds that would require a rate increase, until the district shall have first given notice to the users of the district of such anticipated action;“(4) The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, shall apply to all procedures and proceedings coming before the commission pursuant to this subsection (b), to the extent not inconsistent with this chapter; and“(5)(A) This subsection (b) applies to any gas utility district for the reasons set out in § 7-82-103; and “(B) This subsection (b) also applies in counties having the following populations, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census: not less than nor more than 13,600 13,610 28,500 28,560 28,690 28,750 48,400 48,500 84,000 84,100”

The 2018 amendment substituted “uniform audit manual prepared by the comptroller of the treasury” for “rules and regulations promulgated by the comptroller of the treasury” in (5).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 140, § 13. April 16, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 129, § 15. April 17, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 495, § 11. February 22, 2018.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1973, ch. 249, §§ 9-11; 1974, ch. 633, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-2638; Acts 1980, ch. 445, § 2; 1987, ch. 422, § 2; 1989, ch. 139, § 1; 1989, ch. 221, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 82; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 129, § 7, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-82-103 concerned the applicability of §§7-82-102,7-82-402(b) and65-4-105.

7-82-104. Exemption from state regulation — Rules of construction.

Neither the Tennessee public utility commission nor any other board or commission of like character hereafter created shall have jurisdiction over the district in the management and control of any system, including the regulation of its rates, fees, tolls or charges, except to the extent provided by this chapter and by the Wastewater Facilities Act of 1987, compiled in title 68, chapter 221, part 10.

It shall be the obligation of every judge and every public official having occasion to construe §§ 7-82-102 and 7-82-402(b) to so construe them as to accomplish the ends indicated by the findings and policies set forth in the preamble and section 1 of Acts 1973, ch. 249.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.42 (Williams, § 3695.41); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 249, §§ 1, 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2613; Acts 1987, ch. 299, § 17; 1995, ch. 305, § 83; 2017, ch. 94, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. The preamble and § 1 of Acts 1973, ch. 249, referred to in this section, provide:

“Whereas, the general assembly has on many occasions considered remedial legislation affecting districts created under the Utility District Law of 1937; and

“Whereas, the general assembly has repeatedly investigated and received and thoroughly considered reports concerning the rates, services, charges and practices of districts created under the Utility District Law of 1937; and

“Whereas, the general assembly recognizes that citizens serving as commissioner of such utility districts perform a public service; that it is needful that more orderly procedures be established to communicate complaints to such commissioners so that the commissioners can properly act thereon as a body instead of being individually subjected to citizen complaints; that the procedures presently provided for reviewing rates and services could be improved by taking advantage of the existing expertise of the public service commission; and

“Whereas, careful consideration has been given by the general assembly to conflicting demands and long established policies which have for the most part resulted in sound administration of utility district systems, their expansion and their rate structures; Now, therefore, be it enacted by the general assembly of the state of Tennessee:

“Sec. 1. This legislation is intended to remedy past complaints and to preserve and enhance the public benefits which have customarily been derived from the operations of utility districts created under the Utility District Law of 1937. To this end, it shall be the obligation of every judge and every public official having occasion to construe this act to so construe it as to accomplish the ends indicated by the findings and policies hereinbefore stated.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Neither the Tennessee public utility commission” for “Neither the Tennessee regulatory authority” at the beginning of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, §§ 2, 7; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3.

7-82-105. Exemption from taxation.

So long as a district shall own any system, the property and revenue of such system shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation. Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and the income from the bonds shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.41 (Williams, § 3695.40); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2626; Acts 2001, ch. 28, § 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-106. Prohibition of racial discrimination.

It is unlawful for any utility district organized under this chapter, the Utility District Law of 1937, or under any other public or private act, to discriminate on account of race in providing utility services or in laying out the services that they are to provide.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1973, ch. 281, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-2639; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-107. Chapter unaffected by other law — Construction.

This chapter is complete in itself and shall be controlling. The provisions of any other law, general, special or local, except as provided in this chapter, shall not apply to a district incorporated under this chapter; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed as impairing the powers and duties of the department of environment and conservation.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.43 (Williams, § 3695.42); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2627.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Local Government — 1962 Tennessee Survey (Gilbert Merritt, Jr.), 16 Vand. L. Rev. 800 (1963).

Attorney General Opinions. “Growth and Development Fees” and “Impact Fees” levied by local utilities. OAG 12-11, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (2/3/12).

7-82-108. Authorized investments.

In order to provide a safe temporary medium for investment of idle funds, utility districts are authorized to invest in the following:

Bonds, notes, or treasury bills of the United States;

Nonconvertible debt securities of the following federal government sponsored enterprises; provided, that the securities are rated in the highest category by at least two (2) nationally recognized rating services:

The federal home loan bank;

The federal national mortgage association;

The federal farm credit bank; and

The federal home loan mortgage corporation;

Any other obligations not listed in subdivisions (a)(1)(A) and (B) that are guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States or any of its agencies;

Certificates of deposit and other evidences of deposit at state and federal chartered banks and savings and loan associations. All investments made pursuant to this subdivision (a)(1)(D) shall be secured in the manner set forth in § 9-1-107 or title 9, chapter 4, parts 1 and 4;

Obligations of the United States or its agencies under a repurchase agreement for a shorter time than the maturity date of the security itself, if the market value of the security itself is more than the amount of funds invested; provided, that utility districts may invest in repurchase agreements only if the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee approves repurchase agreements as an authorized investment, and if such investments are made in accordance with procedures established by the state funding board; and

The local government investment pool created by title 9, chapter 4, part 7.

The investments listed in subdivisions (a)(1)(A)-(D) may have a maturity of not greater than four (4) years from the date of investment; however, such investments may have a maturity of greater than four (4) years from the date of investment, if the maturity is approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Investing in the instruments set forth in subdivision (a)(1)(B) or (a)(1)(E) shall require the following:

The utility district's governing board must authorize the investment; and

The utility district's governing board shall adopt a written investment policy to govern the use of investments, with the policies being no less restrictive than those established by the state funding board to govern state investments in these types of instruments.

Investment in instruments covered by subdivision (a)(3)(A) shall be prohibited until the utility district's governing board has adopted written policies to govern the use of the investments or has voted to authorize the investment.

Proceeds of bonds, notes and other obligations issued by utility districts, reserves held in connection with the bonds, notes or other obligations and the investment income from the bonds, notes or other obligations, may be invested in obligations that:

Are rated in either of the two (2) highest rated categories by a nationally recognized rating agency of such obligations;

Are direct general obligations of a state of the United States, or a political subdivision or instrumentality of a state, having general taxing powers; and

Have a final maturity on the date of investment of not to exceed forty-eight (48) months, or that may be tendered by the holder to the issuer of the bonds, notes or other obligations, or an agent of the issuer, at not less than forty-eight-month intervals; or

Are rated in the two (2) highest rating categories by a nationally recognized rating agency of such obligations;

Are obligations of a state of the United States, or a political subdivision or instrumentality of a state, secured solely by revenues received by or on behalf of the state or political subdivision or instrumentality of the state, which revenues are irrevocably pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on such obligations; and

Have a final maturity on the date of investment of not to exceed forty-eight (48) months, or that may be tendered by the holder to the issuer of the bonds, notes and other obligations, or an agent of the issuer, at not less than forty-eight-month intervals.

Such proceeds and the investment income on the proceeds may also be invested as otherwise set forth in this section.

The investments authorized by this section are in addition to those authorized in any other general law.

Acts 1989, ch. 401, § 1; 1990, ch. 814, § 2; 1991, ch. 165, § 2; 2004, ch. 491, §§ 1-5; 2006, ch. 693, § 8; 2010, ch. 868, §§ 22, 23.

7-82-109. Water utility system operated by county — Transfer to utility district — Procedure.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any utility district having all or part of its official territory within a county may by resolution agree to accept transfer of all or a part of a water utility system operated by the county pursuant to a previous transfer of such system by a utility district to the county under this chapter, or its operation under a private act, or otherwise, which resolution must contain provisions agreeing to operate such system for the public benefit, and requiring the protection of all rights of bondholders, and which resolution must specifically state that the transfer shall be upon such conditions as may be contained in the county legislative resolution theretofore or thereafter adopted under §5-7-117. When all conditions of such resolutions shall have been met, the county mayor and president of the utility district shall sign an addendum to the contract, identifying the county and the utility district resolutions of which the contract consists, certifying that all conditions therein have been met, and shall cause such addendum to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the county at the expense of the utility district, upon which publication the transfer shall thereupon be consummated by operation of law without the need for the execution of any instruments of transfer.

Acts 1991, ch. 228, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Transfer by county of water utility system to utility district, §5-7-117.

7-82-110. Natural gas utility districts adjacent to tourist resort counties.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any natural gas utility district that is located and operated in a tourist resort county may also provide natural gas service to consumers in any municipality in an adjacent tourist resort county.

As used in this section, “tourist resort county” means a county having more than five percent (5%) of its territory located within the boundaries of a national park established pursuant to 16 U.S.C. § 403.

Acts 1993, ch. 375, § 2.

7-82-111. Membership in local chambers of commerce.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a utility district from becoming a member of a local chamber of commerce.

Acts 1995, ch. 47, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. A utility district is authorized to contribute funds to its local chamber of commerce, its county government, or its county's nonprofit economic development corporation for economic development activities aimed at increasing development in the district's service area in anticipation of increasing its customer base and service loads, OAG 03-017 (2/19/03).

A utility district may pay membership dues to the chamber of commerce assessed at a higher rate than other members, so long as the assessment structure of dues is reasonable, OAG 03-017 (2/19/03).

7-82-112. Utility service to customer in adjoining utility district.

Notwithstanding § 7-82-301(a), a utility district shall be allowed to provide utility service to a customer located within the boundaries of an adjoining utility district if the customer or adjoining utility district files a request with the utility management review board for the customer to obtain utility service from the adjoining utility district and if the utility management review board finds that:

Either the utility district within which the customer is located has refused to provide utility service to the customer or is not able or willing to provide service within a reasonable period of time at a reasonable cost as determined by the utility management review board; and

The adjoining utility district is willing to provide utility service to the customer.

If the utility management review board finds that the customer should be served by the adjoining utility district, then the utility management review board shall enter an order setting forth its findings and granting the service request.

This section shall only apply to the request of a single customer of a utility district for utility service from an adjoining utility district.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the exclusive or prior right of a utility district to provide utility service within its boundaries to any other customer located within its boundaries under state law or to affect the exclusive or prior right to a utility district to provide utility service within its boundaries under federal law.

Acts 2008, ch. 852, § 1.

7-82-113. Expenditures for lawful district purpose.

All expenditures of money made by a utility district must be made for a lawful district purpose.

Acts 2011, ch. 392, § 3.